test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-k21_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - : # k_
    stuðul+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: stuðul
    stuðul+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef: stuðul
    stuðul+N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef: stuðli
    stuðul+N+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef: stuðuls
    stuðul+N+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef: stuðlar
    stuðul+N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef: stuðlar
    stuðul+N+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef: stuðlum
    stuðul+N+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef: stuðla
    stuðul+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+Def: stuðulin
    stuðul+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Def: stuðulin
    stuðul+N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Def: stuðlinum
    stuðul+N+Msc+Sg+Gen+Def: stuðulsins
    stuðul+N+Msc+Pl+Nom+Def: stuðlarnir
    stuðul+N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Def: stuðlarnar
    stuðul+N+Msc+Pl+Dat+Def: stuðlunum
    stuðul+N+Msc+Pl+Gen+Def: stuðlanna
